Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1369
Appeal.

Any party to a decision of the department under the Cremation of Human Remains Act may appeal such decision. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 15.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.